Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.145

Appeal—No bond required.

A bond of any kind shall not be required of a claimant appealing to the superior court, the court of appeals, or the supreme court from a finding of the department affecting the claimant's right to retirement or disability benefits.

[ 2004 c 242 s 19.]